bulgarian.affix
flag *V:
    А        >      -А,АЛ
    А        >      -А,АЛА
    А        >      -А,АЛАТА
    А        >      -А,АЛИ
    А        >      -А,АЛИТЕ
    А        >      -А,АЛИЯ
    А        >      -А,АЛИЯТ
    А        >      -А,АЛО
    А        >      -А,АЛОТО
    А        >      -А,АТ
    А        >      -А,АХ
    А        >      -А,АХА
    А        >      -А,АХМЕ
    А        >      -А,АХТЕ
    А        >      -А,АЩ
    А        >      -А,АЩА
    А        >      -А,АЩАТА
    А        >      -А,АЩИ
    А        >      -А,АЩИТЕ
    А        >      -А,АЩИЯ
    А        >      -А,АЩИЯТ
    А        >      -А,АЩО
    А        >      -А,АЩОТО
    А        >      -А,ЕЙКИ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛА
    А        >      -А,ЕЛАТА
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИЯ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛИЯТ
    А        >      -А,ЕЛО
    А        >      -А,ЕЛОТО
    А        >      -А,ЕТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕХ
    А        >      -А,ЕХА
    А        >      -А,ЕХМЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕХТЕ
    А        >      -А,ЕШЕ
    А        >      -А,И
    А        >      -А,ИМ
    А        >      -А,ИТЕ
    А        >      -А,ИШ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЙКИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕН
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕНОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕШЕ
    Я        >      -Я,И
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ИЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ИМ
    Я        >      -Я,ИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИХ
    Я        >      -Я,ИХА
    Я        >      -Я,ИХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ИШ
    Я        >      -Я,Й
    Я        >      -Я,ЙТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩО
    Я        >      -Я,ЯЩОТО

flag *W:
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЙКИ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛАТА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛИ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛИТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛИЯ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛИЯТ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЛОТО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕМ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕХ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕХА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕХМЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕХТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕШ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕШЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩАТА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩИ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩИТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩИЯ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩИЯТ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЕЩОТО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЙ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЙТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЛИ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЛИТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЛИЯ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЛИЯТ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕТИ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕТИТЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЕЯТ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,Я
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯЛ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯЛА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯЛАТА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯЛО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯЛОТО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯТ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯТА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯТАТА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯТИЯ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯТИЯТ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯТО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯТОТО
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯХ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯХА
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯХМЕ
    Е Я      >      -ЕЯ,ЯХТЕ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖАТ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕЛ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕЛА
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕЛАТА
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕЛИ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕЛИТЕ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕЛИЯ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕЛИЯТ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕЛО
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕЛОТО
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕМ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕТЕ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕХ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕХА
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕХМЕ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕХТЕ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕШ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖЕШЕ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЖИ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗА
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАЛ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАЛА
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАЛАТА
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАЛИ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАЛИТЕ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАЛИЯ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАЛИЯТ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАЛО
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАЛОТО
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАН
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАНА
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАНАТА
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАНИ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАНИТЕ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАНИЯ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАНИЯТ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАНО
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАНОТО
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАХ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАХА
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАХМЕ
    Ж А      >      -ЖА,ЗАХТЕ
